Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB548.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6120(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6120. Limitation on the regulation of firearms and ammunition.* * *(a.4) Relief.--(1) A person adversely affected by any manner of ordinance, resolution, rule, practice or other action promulgated or enforced by a county, municipality or township in violation of subsection (a) or 53 Pa.C.S. § 307(a) 12345678910111213141516171819 (relating to regulation of firearms and ammunition) or 2962(g) (relating to limitation on municipal powers), may seek declarative and injunctive relief and the actual damages attributable to the violation in an appropriate court.(2) If a person adversely affected under paragraph (1) is a plaintiff who provided 60 days' prior written notice of the person's intention to file a claim under this subsection to the defendant, the court shall award reasonable expenses to the person adversely affected if the claim under paragraph (1) results in:(i) a final determination by a court in favor of the person adversely affected; or(ii) rescission or repeal of the challenged manner of regulation or enforcement after suit has been filed under paragraph (1) but prior to a final determination by a court.(3) If a person is a defendant in a proceeding asserting a defense under subsection (a) or 53 Pa.C.S. § 307(a) or 2962(g), the court shall award reasonable expenses payable by th e county, municipality or township to the person if the defense results in the withdrawal or dismissal of the proceeding, an entry of nolle prosequi or an acquittal on the basis of the defense.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Dealer." The term shall include any person engaged in the business of selling at wholesale or retail a firearm or ammunition."Firearms." This term shall have the meaning given to it in 20250HB0548PN0549 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 5515 (relating to prohibiting of paramilitary training) but shall not include air rifles as that term is defined in section 6304 (relating to sale and use of air rifles)."Person adversely affected." Any of the following: (1) A person who has standing under the laws of this Commonwealth to bring a claim under subsection (a.4)(1).(2) A resident of this Commonwealth who may legally possess a firearm under Federal or State law.(3) A membership organization, the members of which include a person described under paragraph (1) or (2)."Political subdivision." The term shall include any home rule charter municipality, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or school district." Reasonable expenses." The term includes, but is not limited to, attorney fees, expert witness fees, court costs and compensation for loss of income.Section 2. Title 53 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 307. Regulation of firearms and ammunition.(a) Preemption.--The General Assembly has always intended and continues to intend to occupy the entire field of regulation of firearms, ammunition, magazines, accessories, firearm components and ammunition components in this Commonwealth, including the purchase, sale, transfer, taxation, manufacture, ownership, possession, use, discharge, transportation and reporting of loss or theft of firearms, ammunition, firearm components and ammunition components in this Commonwealth, to the exclusion of any existing or future ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, practice or other action adopted by a municipality. The Commonwealth, by this section, preempts and supersedes any manner of ordinance, resolution, regulation, 20250HB0548PN0549 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rule, practice or other action promulgated or enforced by a municipality of firearms, ammunition, firearm components or ammunition components in this Commonwealth, and any such action is declared null and void.(b) Continuing effect.--The provisions of section 2962(g) (relating to limitation on municipal powers) and 18 Pa.C.S. § 6120(a) (relating to limitation on the regulation of firearms and ammunition) shall continue to preempt and supersede a local ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, practice or other action insofar as the local ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, practice or other action is inconsistent with the provisions of section 2962(g) or 18 Pa.C.S. § 6120(a).Section 3. Within 30 days of the effective date of this section, the Attorney General of this Commonwealth shall notify State associations for all municipalities of the amendment or addition of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6120(a.4) and (b) and 53 Pa.C.S. § 307.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect in 90 days:The amendment or addition of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6120(a.4) and (b).The addition of 53 Pa.C.S. § 307.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0548PN0549 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223